District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.05

Relationship to other land-use law.

This chapter does not authorize a use of real property that is otherwise prohibited by zoning, by law other than this chapter regulating use of real property, or by a recorded instrument that has priority over the environmental covenant. An environmental covenant may prohibit or restrict uses of real property which are authorized by zoning or by law other than this chapter.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 105, 53 DCR 1652
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.